Washington statutes.
RCW 35.68.076

Curb ramps for persons with disabilities—Model standards.

The department of enterprise services shall, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act, adopt several suggested model design, construction, or location standards to aid counties, cities, and towns in constructing curb ramps to allow reasonable access to the crosswalk for persons with physical disabilities without uniquely endangering blind persons. The department of enterprise services shall consult with persons with physical disabilities, blind persons, counties, cities, and the state building code council in adopting the suggested standards.

[ 2015 c 225 s 30; 1989 c 175 s 84; 1977 ex.s. c 137 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.